Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB91.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 708(b)(17) introductory paragraph of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 708. Exceptions for public records.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following are exempt from access by a requester under this act:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 (17) A record of an agency, except for the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, relating to a noncriminal investigation, including:* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0091PN0074 - 2 - 12345